Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-414
Profit, defined.

Profit shall mean the gross proceeds less reasonable sums necessarily and actually expended for prizes, taxes, and allowable expenses.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 135.